District of Columbia statutes.
34-1603

Additional laboratories for testing gas of Washington Gas Light and Georgetown Gas Light Companies.

Two additional laboratories shall be provided and fitted up by the Washington Gas Light Company, subject to the approval of the Mayor of the District of Columbia, and shall be furnished with suitable apparatus, to the satisfaction of the said Mayor, at a total cost not to exceed $1,000, for inspecting and testing the illuminating gas manufactured and distributed by the said Washington Gas Light Company and the gas meters used for measuring the gas supplied to consumers by the said Washington Gas Light Company. One of the said laboratories shall be located in the northwestern portion of the City of Washington and the other in the southeastern portion of said city, and the cost of providing and fitting up the said laboratories shall be paid for by the said Washington Gas Light Company. A laboratory shall be provided and fitted up by the Georgetown Gas Light Company, subject to the approval of the Mayor of the District of Columbia, and shall be furnished with suitable apparatus, to the satisfaction of the said Mayor at a total cost not to exceed $1,000, for inspecting and testing the illuminating gas manufactured and distributed by the said Washington Gas Light Company and the gas meters used for measuring the gas supplied to consumers by the said Georgetown Gas Light Company; provided, that the cost of providing and fitting up the said laboratory shall be paid by the said Georgetown Gas Light Company; provided further, that the Washington Gas Light Company and the Georgetown Gas Light Company shall, at the beginning of each fiscal year, in proportion to their respective receipts from sales of gas for the fiscal year immediately preceding, provide in advance, by depositing with the Collector of Taxes of the District of Columbia, a sum sufficient to pay the necessary expenses of maintaining the service of inspecting and testing illuminating gas and gas meters, herein provided for, as estimated by the Mayor of the District of Columbia, and not to exceed $500 per annum for each of the said additional laboratories.

History

Mar. 3, 1893, 27 Stat. 543, ch. 199

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-1102.
1973 Ed., § 43-1202.

Editor's Notes

Office of Collector of Taxes abolished: The Office of the Collector of Taxes was abolished and the functions thereof transferred to the Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia by Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1952. All functions of the Office of the Collector of Taxes including the functions of all officers, employees and subordinate agencies were transferred to the Director, Department of General Administration by Reorganization Order No. 3, dated August 28, 1952. Reorganization Order No. 20, dated November 10, 1952, transferred the functions of the Collector of Taxes to the Finance Office. The same Order provided for the Office of the Collector of Taxes headed by a Collector in the Finance Office, and abolished the previously existing Office of the Collector of Taxes. Reorganization Order No. 20 was superseded and replaced by Organization Order No. 121, dated December 12, 1957, which provided that the Finance Office (consisting of the Office of the Finance Officer, Property Tax Division, Revenue Division, Treasury Division, Accounting Division, and Data Processing Division) would continue under the direction and control of the Director of General Administration, and that the Treasury Division would perform the function of collecting revenues of the District of Columbia and depositing the same with the Treasurer of the United States. Organization Order No. 121 was revoked by Organization Order No. 3, dated December 13, 1967, Part IVC of which prescribed the functions of the Finance Office within a newly established Department of General Administration. The executive functions of the Board of Commissioners were transferred to the Commissioner of the District of Columbia by § 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967. Functions of the Finance Office as stated in Part IVC of Organization Order No. 3 were transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Revenue by Commissioner’s Order No. 69-96, dated March 7, 1969.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.